Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5760.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that too often both juvenile inmates and adult inmates do not have readily available access to their legislators and their government. Furthermore, the legislature finds that the state of Washington owns surplus property conveniently located directly on the state capitol campus. Inmates would benefit from being placed directly on the state capitol campus and it would enhance the ability of legislators to meet directly with inmates.The legislature further finds that the general administration building is a historically significant building that is worth preserving. The building was designed by the prominent Tacoma architect, A. Gordon Lumm and is an important example of modern architecture on the capitol campus. The sparsely decorated exterior and minimalist appearance is representative of the international style and would make a suitable building to house inmates.Therefore, the legislature finds that a new community facility and work release center should be colocated using the general administration building.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. This act may be cited as the inmates in Olympia act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 3. There is established in Olympia, Thurston county, a dual community institution known as the Washington capitol reentry center.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. The purpose of the Washington capitol reentry center is to provide qualifying adult and juvenile inmates with the opportunity to be conveniently located in close proximity to publicly elected officials to ensure their full participation in the legislative process.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 5. (1) The secretary of the department of children, youth, and families and the secretary of the department of corrections shall jointly develop and implement the colocation of a community facility, as defined in RCW 72.05.020, and work release facility under chapter 72.65 RCW at the Washington capitol reentry center.(2) Except as provided in section 6 of this act, the Washington capitol reentry center shall comply with any other relevant laws.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 6. (1) The secretary of the department of children, youth, and families and the secretary of the department of corrections shall jointly provide notice of plans to colocate a community facility and work release facility pursuant to this section.(2) The secretaries shall provide notice:(a) To all newspapers of general circulation in the local area and all local radio stations, television stations, and cable networks;(b) To appropriate school districts, private schools, kindergartens, city and county libraries, and all other local government offices within a one-half mile radius of the Washington capitol reentry center;(c) To the local chamber of commerce, local economic development agencies, and any other local organizations that request such notification;(d) In writing to all residents and/or property owners within a one-half mile radius of the Washington capitol reentry center;(e) In writing to any government subunit, individual working for a government, and any elected official located within a one-half mile from the Washington capitol reentry center;(f) During a special joint notice session to be broadcast live from the steps of the Washington capitol reentry center on TVW; and(g) During a public meeting in the local community affected by the siting.(3) The requirements of RCW 72.05.400 and 72.65.220 do not apply to a colocated community facility and work release facility established under this act.(4) Members of the public may provide public comment on the siting of the center by writing to their state elected representatives.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 7. Sections 1 through 6 of this act constitute a new chapter in Title 72 RCW.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 8. This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately.--- END ---